Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.555

Unauthorized access.

Any person who willfully and without authority accesses or assists another person or entity with unauthorized access to a voting center, election office, ballot counting area, ballot storage area, or any election system, or provides unauthorized access to another person or entity to a voting center, election office, ballot counting area, ballot storage area, or any election system, whether electronic or physical access, is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2024 c 28 s 7.]